Tennessee, session 114, SB0170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-308(d)(2), is amended by
adding the following at the end of the subdivision:
In addition to any other disposition authorized by law, the disposition must include the
suspension of the minor's driving privileges or ability to obtain a driver license for a
period of one (1) year in accordance with the procedures set out in title 55, chapter 10,
part 7.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to acts committed on or after that date.
SB0170
000913
- 1 -